Colorado statutes. TITLE 20 District Attorneys
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

20-1-101. Bond and oath or affirmation of district attorney and staff.

Every district attorney, chief deputy district attorney, deputy district attorney, special deputy district attorney, and assistant district attorney shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101. A district attorney shall also execute to the people of the state of Colorado a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars with a good and sufficient individual, schedule, or blanket corporate surety bond or other acceptable security, to be approved by the secretary of state, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office, as the same are prescribed by law, and upon any breach of such bond, an action shall lie thereon for the benefit of any county fund or person injured thereby.

As the district attorney may direct, the assistant and deputy district attorneys and other employees appointed pursuant to this title may be required to file with the secretary of state the bond required by law to be filed by district attorneys.

Source:

R.S.

p. 262, § 3.

G.L.

omitted.

G.S.

§ 1061.

R.S. 08:

§ 2095.

C.L.

§ 5774.

CSA:

C. 55, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-1.

L. 71:

p. 516, § 1.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 693, § 6, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

20-1-102. Appear on behalf of state and counties.

Every district attorney shall appear in behalf of the state and the several counties of his or her district:

In all indictments, actions, and proceedings which may be pending in the district court in any county within his district wherein the state or the people thereof or any county of his district may be a party;

On the hearing of every writ of habeas corpus sued out by any person charged with or convicted of any public offense before the judge of his district;

In any such indictment, action, or proceeding which may be removed from the district court of any county within his district for appellate review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules;

In any such indictment, action, or proceeding which may be brought to the district court of any county in his or her district by change of venue from any other district;

When he or she may deem it advisable to do so, in the preliminary examination of persons charged with any offense before any judge within his or her district; and

In any probation probable cause hearing brought pursuant to the rules adopted under the "Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision", part 28 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S., or the interstate compact for juveniles, part 7 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S.

Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to prevent the county commissioners of any county from employing one or more attorneys to appear and prosecute or defend in behalf of the people of the state or of such county, in any such indictment, action, or proceeding.

The district attorney, when enforcing support laws pursuant to statute or contract, may use any remedy, either civil or criminal, available under the laws of this state and may appear on behalf of the people of the state of Colorado in any judicial district in this state. When doing so, the district attorney represents the people of the state of Colorado, and nothing within this section creates an attorney-client relationship between the district attorney and any party, other than the people of the state of Colorado, or witness to the action; except that any district attorney who is a contractual agent for a county department of human or social services shall collect a fee pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2).

Source:

R.S.

p. 262, § 4.

G.L.

§ 895.

G.S.

§ 1056.

R.S. 08:

§ 2096.

C.L.

§ 5975.

CSA:

C. 55, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-2.

L. 64:

p. 392, § 32.

L. 81:

(3) added, p. 901, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 82:

(3) amended, p. 281, § 5, effective April 2.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 635, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 499, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) added, (HB 16-1268), ch. 141, p. 419, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 434, § 82, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

20-1-103. Collect forfeited recognizances.

It is the exclusive duty of the district attorney to provide for the collection of forfeited recognizances and turn the money so collected into the registry of the court declaring the forfeiture. In fulfilling such duty, the district attorney may contract with any person or entity and provide for payment of any fees and costs for the services of such person or entity out of such moneys collected.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 135, § 1.

R.S.

08, § 2097.

C.L.

§ 5976.

CSA:

C. 55, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-3.

L. 73:

p. 1403, § 34.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 962, § 5, effective May 27.

Cross references:

For procedure in disposition of security deposits upon forfeiture or termination of bond and enforcement when forfeiture not set aside, see §§ 16-4-111 and 16-4-112.

20-1-104. Appear at inquests.

The district attorneys of the several judicial districts in the state of Colorado shall appear in their respective districts at all inquests held by any coroner and have power to subpoena and examine witnesses at any such inquest.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 151, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2098.

C.L.

§ 5977.

CSA:

C. 55, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-4.

20-1-105. Opinions to county officers - representation.

The district attorney, upon request of any county officer of any county within his district, without fee, shall give his opinion in writing upon all questions of law having references to the duties of such officer which may be submitted and shall file and preserve in his office a copy of all such opinions.

The district attorney, upon a request in the form of a resolution by the board of county commissioners of any county within his district, shall represent any county officer enumerated in article 10 of title 30, C.R.S., or the employees of any such officer in the defense of any civil suit or civil proceeding brought against such officer in any court of this state or any federal court if such action directly relates to the duties of the county officer.

In any city and county, the district attorney, upon a request in the form of a resolution by city council, shall represent any city and county officer, as provided in the charter of such city and county, or the employees of any such officer in the defense of any civil suit or civil proceeding brought against such officer in any court of this state or any federal court if such action directly relates to the duties of any such officer.

Source:

R.S.

p. 262, § 5.

G.L.

§ 896.

G.S.

§ 1057.

R.S. 08:

§ 2099.

C.L.

§ 5978.

CSA:

C. 55, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-5.

L. 72:

p. 294, § 1.

Cross references:

For public trustees authorized to cooperate and contract with one another and others, see § 38-37-111.

20-1-106. Appear and advise grand juries.

The district attorneys for the several judicial districts in the state of Colorado shall appear in their respective districts at all sessions of any grand jury which may be convened in any county within their respective districts, and it is the duty of the district attorney to advise any grand jury convened within his district and to examine witnesses who may be subpoenaed before any such grand jury.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 165, § 1.

C.L.

§ 5979.

CSA:

C. 55, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-6.

20-1-106.1. Preparation and review of affidavits and warrants.

The district attorneys of the several judicial districts in the state of Colorado shall:

Render, in their quasi-judicial capacity, legal advice to peace officers, upon the request of such officers or of the court, pertaining to the preparation and review of affidavits and warrants for arrests, searches, seizures, nontestimonial identification items, and court orders for the production of records;

Examine and evaluate each affidavit for a no-knock search warrant sought pursuant to part 3 of article 3 of title 16, C.R.S., and render legal advice regarding such affidavit to the peace officer submitting the affidavit before such affidavit is submitted to a judge. A district attorney, including any assistant district attorney, chief deputy district attorney, or deputy district attorney, shall indicate approval of an affidavit by placing the date and his or her signature and attorney registration number on the affidavit as allowed by statute or court rule. A district attorney shall only sign an affidavit for a no-knock search warrant sought pursuant to part 3 of article 3 of title 16, C.R.S., upon satisfaction that the information in such affidavit:

Fulfills the requirements of section 16-3-303, C.R.S.; and

Supports the lawful issuance of a search warrant pursuant to section 16-3-301, C.R.S.

In the absence of the bad faith performance of the duties specified in this section, the district attorneys of the state of Colorado shall be immune from liability for the performance of said duties; except that such immunity shall not apply to charges of perjury in the first degree, perjury in the second degree, or false swearing brought pursuant to section 18-8-502, 18-8-503, or 18-8-504, C.R.S., respectively.

The division of criminal justice within the Colorado department of public safety shall review existing policies relating to the issuance and use of no-knock search warrants pursuant to section 24-33.5-503 (1)(q), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 717, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 772, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 651, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1378, § 3, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the description of "peace officer", see § 16-2.5-101.

20-1-107. Disqualification - court to appoint prosecutor - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that the office of the district attorney was created by the state constitution and that the state constitution gives to the general assembly the exclusive authority to prescribe the duties of the office of the district attorney. The general assembly finds and declares that this section is necessary to protect the independence of persons duly elected to the office of district attorney.

A district attorney may only be disqualified in a particular case at the request of the district attorney or upon a showing that the district attorney has a personal or financial interest or finds special circumstances that would render it unlikely that the defendant would receive a fair trial. A motion to disqualify a district attorney shall be served upon the district attorney at least two weeks before the motion is heard. Such motion shall contain at least a statement of the facts setting forth the grounds for the claimed disqualification and the legal authorities relied upon by the movant and shall be supported by affidavits of witnesses who are competent to testify to the facts set forth in the affidavit. The district attorney may file a response in opposition to the motion and may appear at any hearing held on the motion. The judge shall review the pleadings and determine whether an evidentiary hearing is necessary. The motion shall not be granted unless requested by the district attorney or unless the court finds that the district attorney has a personal or financial interest or special circumstances exist that would render it unlikely that the defendant would receive a fair trial. The order disqualifying the district attorney shall be stayed pending any appeal authorized by this section. If the motion is brought at or before the preliminary hearing, it may not be renewed at the trial court on the basis of facts that were raised or could have been raised at the time of the original motion.

An interlocutory appeal from an order of disqualification of a district attorney entered in the district court shall be filed in the supreme court pursuant to section 16-12-102 (2), C.R.S. An appeal from an order of disqualification filed in the county court shall be filed in the district court. In computing the time period within which a trial must be commenced, the period during which an appeal pursuant to this section is pending shall be excluded.

If the district attorney is disqualified in any case which it is his or her duty to prosecute or defend, the court having criminal jurisdiction may appoint a special prosecutor to prosecute or defend the cause. The judge shall appoint the special prosecutor from among the full-time district attorneys, assistant district attorneys, or deputy district attorneys who serve in judicial districts other than where the appointment is made; except that, upon the written approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, the judge may appoint any disinterested private attorney who is licensed to practice law in the state of Colorado to serve as the special prosecutor. Any special prosecutor appointed pursuant to this section shall be compensated as provided in section 20-1-308.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 65, § 1.

G.L.

§ 897.

G.S.

§ 1058.

R.S. 08:

§ 2109.

C.L.

§ 5994.

CSA:

C. 55, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-7.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 758, § 4, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For procedure when district attorney refused without justification to prosecute, see § 16-5-209.

20-1-108. When sick or absent, court to appoint.

If he is sick or absent, such court shall appoint some person to discharge the duties of the office until the proper officer resumes the discharge of his duties.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 65, § 2.

G.L.

§ 898.

G.S.

§ 1059.

R.S. 08:

§ 2110.

C.L.

§ 5995.

CSA:

C. 55, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-8.

20-1-109. Powers of appointee.

The person thus appointed shall possess the same power as the proper officer would if he were present.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 65, § 3.

G.L.

§ 899.

G.S.

§ 1060.

R.S. 08:

§ 2111.

C.L.

§ 5996.

CSA:

C. 55, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 45-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-1-9.

20-1-110. Intergovernmental cooperation and contracts.

Every district attorney has the power to authorize and approve the participation of his judicial district in intergovernmental cooperative relationships concerning criminal prosecution and may enter into contracts on behalf of his judicial district for cooperation with other district attorneys concerning such prosecution and prosecution-related services; except that no district attorney shall be authorized or empowered by this section to obligate county funds which have not been appropriated by the affected boards of county commissioners in his judicial district.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1033, § 1, effective July 1.

20-1-111. District attorneys may cooperate or contract - contents - appropriation.

District attorneys may cooperate or contract with one another to provide any function or service lawfully authorized to each of the cooperating or contracting district attorneys, including the sharing of costs and the administration and distribution of moneys received for mandated costs.

Any such contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, obligations, and responsibilities, financial and otherwise, of the contracting district attorneys.

Any such contract may provide for the joint exercise of the function or service, including the establishment of a separate legal entity to do so. The district attorneys may allocate up to five percent of the moneys received for mandated costs authorized by the general assembly for administrative expenses.

The statewide organization representing district attorneys or any other organization established pursuant to this article may receive, manage, and expend state funds in the manner prescribed by the general assembly on behalf of the district attorneys who are members of the organization.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate three hundred fifty thousand dollars to the department of law for allocation to the Colorado district attorneys' council, the statewide organization representing district attorneys, or its successor, for the public purpose of providing prosecution training, seminars, continuing education programs, and other prosecution-related services on behalf of the district attorneys who are members of the organization, including, but not limited to, costs and expenses for personnel, administration, materials, and travel.

Repealed.

The general assembly shall make an appropriation to the department of law for state fiscal year 2019-20 for allocation to the statewide organization representing district attorneys for the public purpose of providing prosecution training concerning determinations of competency to proceed for juveniles and adults, competency evaluation reports, services to restore competency, and certification proceedings governed by article 65 of title 27.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate necessary funds to the department of law for allocation to the Colorado district attorneys' council, or its successor, for the public purpose of providing grants to local district attorneys' offices to cover costs and expenses related to complying with the bond hearing requirements of section 16-4-102 (2)(a). By November 1 of each year, the Colorado district attorneys' council shall submit a request to the joint budget committee for necessary funds consistent with this subsection (4)(d).

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1033, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 761, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) added, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1943, § 69, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (HB 14-1144), ch. 201, p. 732, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2019:

(4)(c) added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2291, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 20-1369), ch. 206, p. 1011, § 1 effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(4)(d) added, (HB 21-1280), ch. 457, p. 3051, § 4, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b)(II)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(b)(II), effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2020, p. 1011.)

20-1-112. Financial audits.

Each office of district attorney in each of the several judicial districts in the state of Colorado shall submit audited annual financial statements prepared in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles to the state auditor. The expenses of such audits shall be paid by each office of district attorney and shall be considered a necessary expense of maintaining his office for the transaction of his official business.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 934, § 1, effective April 4.

20-1-113. Reporting of criminal proceedings involving public school students.

On or before August 1, 2013, and continuing through August 1, 2014, the district attorney of each judicial district, or his or her designee, shall report to the division of criminal justice created in section 24-33.5-502, C.R.S., information about offenses alleged to have been committed by a student that have occurred on school grounds, in a school vehicle, or at a school activity or sanctioned event within the judicial district during the preceding twelve months. Failure to submit a timely report to the division of criminal justice pursuant to this subsection (1) does not relieve a district attorney of his or her responsibility to file the report required by this subsection (1). A district attorney who has failed to file a timely report shall file all such reports with the division of criminal justice no later than August 15, 2015.

The information reported by each district attorney pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include the number of offenses filed in court, including the total number of each type of such offenses, the disposition of each case, and the age, gender, school, and race or ethnicity of each student that the district attorney prosecuted.

The information reported by each district attorney pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include, to the extent practicable and to the extent that such information is collected by the district attorney as of May 19, 2012:

The number of offenses that were referred to the district attorney by a law enforcement agency and were not filed in court, including the total number of each type of such offenses; and

The number of offenses for which the district attorney referred an offender to a juvenile diversion program or other alternative program, including the total number of each type of such offenses.

Notwithstanding section 19-1-303 (5), commencing August 1, 2015, and continuing every August 1 every year thereafter, each district attorney shall report to the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety the name of any student who was granted juvenile or adult diversion for a ticket, summons, or offense that occurred at a public elementary school, middle or junior high school, or high school; in a school vehicle; or at a school activity or sanctioned event. In addition to the full name of the student, the district attorney shall report the student's date of birth, race, ethnicity, and gender and the arrest or incident report number, as recorded by a law enforcement agency. Information, including expunged record information, released by a district attorney to the division of criminal justice pursuant to this section must only be used for research purposes related to school discipline.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19-1-303 (4.7), C.R.S., a district attorney or his or her designee is not subject to any criminal or civil penalty for compliance with the reporting obligations of this section.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1345), ch. 188, p. 745, § 30, effective May 19.

L. 2015:

(1) amended and (4) added, (HB 15-1273), ch. 323, p. 1321, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(4) amended and (5) added, (HB 16-1098), ch. 103, p. 298, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-066), ch. 64, p. 258, § 4, effective April 29.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2012 act adding this section, see section 21 of chapter 188, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. However, section 21 of chapter 188 was repealed by section 7 of chapter 323 (HB 15-1273), Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1273, see section 1 of chapter 323, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

20-1-114. Peace officer-involved shooting investigations - disclosure.

The district attorney shall, if no criminal charges are filed following the completion of an investigation pursuant to section 16-2.5-301, C.R.S., release a report and publicly disclose the report explaining the district attorney's findings, including the basis for the decision not to charge the officer with any criminal conduct. The district attorney shall post the written report on its website or, if it does not have a website, make it publicly available upon request.

If the district attorney refers the matter under investigation to the grand jury, the district attorney shall release a statement at the time the matter is referred to the grand jury disclosing the general purpose of the grand jury's investigation. If no true bill is returned, the grand jury shall issue and publish a report.

All disclosures required by this section remain subject to the criminal justice records act.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15- 219), ch. 210, p. 769, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-217), ch. 110, p. 456, § 8, effective June 19.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 15-219, see section 1 of chapter 210, Session Laws of Colorado 2015. For the legislative declaration in SB 20-217, see section 1 of chapter 110, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

(2) For the criminal justice records act referred to in subsection (3), see part 3 of article 72 of title 24.